nb: Støttede batteristandarder: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Annet
sk-SK: Podporované normy batérií: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Iné
sl-SI: Podprti standardi baterij: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Drugo
sv: Batteristandarder som stöds: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Övrigt
hu: Támogatott akkumulátorszabványok: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Egyéb
cs: Podporované standardy baterií: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Jiné
th: มาตรฐานแบตเตอรี่ที่รองรับ: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Normas de bateria suportados: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Outro
el: Υποστηριζόμενα πρότυπα μπαταρίας: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Άλλο
vi: Các tiêu chuẩn pin được hỗ trợ: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Khác
hr-HR: Podržani standardi akumulatora: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Ostalo
zh-TW: 支援的電池標準: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); 其他
zh-CN: 支持的电池标准: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); 其他
ro-RO: Standarde de baterii acceptate: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Altele
bg-BG: Поддържани стандарти за батерии: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Друго
en: Battery standards supported: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Other
de: Unterstützte Batteriestandards: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Sonstige
lt-LT: Palaikomi akumuliatorių standartai: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Kita
es: Estándares de baterías compatibles: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Otro
tr: Desteklenen batarya standartları: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Diğer
nl: Batterij ondersteunde standaarden: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Overig
fr: Normes de batterie prises en charge: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Autre
pt-BR: Padrões de bateria compatíveis: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Outro
it: Standard delle batterie supportati: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Altro
da: Understøttede batteristandarder: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Andet
pl: Obsługiwane normy akumulatorów: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Inne
fi: Tuetut akkustandardit: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Muu
ja: 対応バッテリー規格: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); その他
ko: 지원 배터리 규격: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE(CCA); 기타
ru: Поддерживаемые стандарты аккумуляторов: BCI; CA; DIN; EN; GB; IEC; JIS; MCA; SAE (CCA); Другое